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DTC P0 110/24* IntakeAirTemperatureSensorCircuit

HINT:
*: Only for Europe

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION
The intake air temperature sensor is built into the air flow meter
and senses the intake air temperature. A thermistor built in the
sensor changes the resistance value according to the intake air
temperature. The lower the intake air temperature, the greater
the thermistor resistance value, and the higher the intake air
temperature, the lower the thermistor resistance value (See
Fig. 1).
The intake air temperature sensor is connected to the engine
ECU. The 5 V power source voltage in the engine ECU is ap-
plied to the intake air temperature sensor from terminal THAF
via resistor R. That is, resistor R and the intake air temperature
sensor are connected in series. When the resistance value of
the intake air temperature sensor changes, according to
changes in the intake air temperature, the voltage at terminal
THAF also varies. Based on this signal, the engine ECU in-
creases the fuel injection volume to improve driveability during

coldengineoperation.

DTC No. DTC Detection Condition Trouble Area

P0110/24
Open or short in intake air temp. sensor circuit for 0.5 sec. or
more

SOpenorshort in intakeair temp.sensorcircuit
S Intakeair temp.sensor (built intoair flowmeter)
SEngineECU

HINT:
When DTC P0110/24 is detected, check the intake air temperature by entering the following menus on the
intelligent tester II: Powertrain / Engine and ECT / Data List / Intake Air.

Temperature displayed Malfunction

−40˚ C (−40˚ F) Open circuit

140˚ C(284 ˚ F)ormore Short circuit
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WIRING DIAGRAM

INSPECTION PROCEDURE
HINT:
S If DTCs related to different systems that have terminal E2 as the ground terminal are output simulta-

neously, terminal E2 may have an open circuit.
S Read freeze frame data using the intelligent tester II. Freeze frame data records the engine conditions

when a malfunction is detected. When troubleshooting, freeze frame data can help determine if the
vehicle was running or stopped, if the engine was warmed up or not, and other data from the time the
malfunction occurred.

When using intelligent tester II:

1 Connect intelligent tester II, and read value of intake air temperature.

PREPARATION:
(a) Connect the intelligent tester II to the DLC3.
(b) Turn the ignition switch ON and push the intelligent tester II main switch ON.
CHECK:
Read the temperature value on the intelligent tester II.
OK:

Same as actual intake air temperature.
HINT:
S If there is open circuit, intelligent tester II indicates −40˚ C (−40˚F).
S If there is short circuit, intelligent tester II indicates 140˚ C (284˚F)  or more.

NG −40˚ C (−40˚ F) ...Gotostep2.
140˚ C(284 ˚ F)ormore ...Gotostep4.

OK

Check for intermittent problems (See page
DI−4) .
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2 Check for open in harness or engine ECU.

PREPARATION:
(a) Disconnect the air flow miter connector.
(b) Connect the sensor wire harness terminals together.
(c) Turn the ignition switch ON.
CHECK:
Read the temperature value on the intelligent tester II.
OK:

Temperature value: 140�C (284�F) or more

OK Confirm good connection at sensor. If OK, re-
place air flow meter.

NG

3 Check for open in harness or engine ECU.

PREPARATION:
(a) Remove the glove compartment door.
(b) Connect between terminals THAF and E2 of the engine

ECU connector.
HINT:
The air flow meter connector is disconnected. Before checking,
do a visual and contact pressure check for the engine ECU con-
nector (See page IN−19).
(c) Turn the ignition switch ON.
CHECK:
Read the temperature value on the intelligent tester II.
OK:

Temperaturevalue: 140�C(284 �F)ormore

OK Open in harness between terminal E2 or THAF,
repair or replace harness.

NG

Confirm good connection at engine ECU. If
OK, replace engine ECU.
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4 Check for short in harness and engine ECU.

PREPARATION:
(a) Disconnect the air flow meter connector.
(b) Turn the ignition switch ON.
CHECK:
Read the temperature value on the intelligent tester II.
OK:

Temperature value: −40�C (−40�F)

OK Replace air flow meter.

NG

5 Check for short in harness or engine ECU.

PREPARATION:
(a) Remove the glove compartment door.
(b) Disconnect the E16 connector from the engine ECU.
HINT:
The air flow meter connector is disconnected.
(c) Turn the ignition switch ON.
CHECK:
Read the temperature value on the intelligent tester II.
OK:

Temperature value: −40�C (−40�F)

OKRepairor replaceharnessorconnector.

NG

Check and replace engine ECU (See page
IN−1 9) .
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When not using intelligent tester II:

1 Check voltage between terminals THAF and E2 of engine ECU connector.

PREPARATION:
(a) Remove the glove compartment door.
(b) Turn the ignition switch ON.
CHECK:
Measure the voltage between terminals THAF and E2 of the en-
gine ECU connector.
OK:

Atmospheric Temperature Voltage

20˚ C (68˚ F) (Engine is cool) 0.2 to 3.8 V

80˚ C (176˚ F) (Engine is hot) 0.1 to 1.5 V

OK Check for intermittent problems (See page
DI−4) .

NG

2 Check intake air temperature sensor.

PREPARATION:
Disconnect the air flow meter connector.
CHECK:
Using an ohmmeter, measure the resistance between terminals
THA and E2.
OK:

Terminals Resistance Temperature

THA − E2 12.5 to 16.9 k� −20˚C (−4˚F)

THA − E2 2.19 to 2.67 k� 20˚C (68˚F)

THA − E2 0.50 to 0.68 k� 60˚C (140˚F)

NG Replace air flow meter.

OK

3 Check for open and short in harness and connector between engine ECU and
atmospheric temperature sensor (See page IN−1 9) .

NG Repair or replace harness or connector.
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OK

Check and replace engine ECU (See page
IN−1 9) .


